Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-3101
City council or board of trustees; vacancy; when.

In all cities of the first and second classes and villages regardless of the form of government, in addition to the events listed in section 32-560 and any other reasons for a vacancy provided by law, after notice and a hearing, a vacancy on the city council or board of trustees shall exist if a member is absent from more than five consecutive regular meetings of the council or board unless the absences are excused by a majority vote of the remaining members.

Laws 2002, LB 1054, § 1.